Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-8] Annual statements.
(a) The fund shall submit to the commissioner each year, not later than one
hundred twenty days after the end of the fund's fiscal year, a financial report
in a form approved by the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner may require other reports
concerning risks insured by the fund as the commissioner deems appropriate. [L
1993, c 339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next